Massachusetts, session 194th, H2194.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (b) of section 12 of chapter 123 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “reception”
the first time it appears, the words:- “, unless the person has been arrested and detained and a
police officer has submitted a petition for hospitalization for such person under subsection (a)”
of 1